Illinois, session 104th, HB4833.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Public Funds Investment Act is amended by 5adding Section 2.4 as follows: 6    (30 ILCS 235/2.4 new)7    Sec. 2.4. Transactions with for-profit companies that 8contract to shelter incarcerated or detained persons 9prohibited.10    (a) In this Section:11    "Contract to shelter incarcerated or detained persons" has 12the meaning given to that term in subsection (a) of Section 131-110.16 of the Illinois Pension Code. 14    "Local government" means a municipality with a population 15of 500,000 or more or a county with a population of 3,000,000 16or more.17    (b) Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, 18a local government shall not invest public funds in any 19investment instrument issued by a for-profit company that 20contracts to shelter incarcerated or detained persons.21    (c) No later than 6 months after the effective date of this 22amendatory Act of the 104th General Assembly, a local 23government shall identify those companies in which the local   HB4833- 2 -LRB104 19093 RPS 32538 b1government owns direct holdings and indirect holdings of 2for-profit companies that contract to shelter incarcerated or 3detained persons that are on the list of restricted companies 4published by the Illinois Investment Policy Board under 5Section 1-110.16 of the Illinois Pension Code.6    (d) A local government shall instruct its investment 7advisors to sell, redeem, divest, or withdraw all holdings of 8a for-profit company that enters into a contract to shelter 9incarcerated or detained persons from the local government's 10assets under management in an orderly and fiduciarily 11responsible manner within 12 months after the company's most 12recent appearance on the list of restricted companies 13published by the Illinois Investment Policy Board list of 14restricted companies under subsection (d) of Section 1-110.16 15of the Pension Code.16    (e) With respect to actions taken in compliance with this 17Section, including all good-faith determinations regarding 18companies as required by this Section, a local government is 19exempt from any conflicting statutory or common law 20obligations, including any fiduciary duties under this Act and 21any obligations with respect to choice of asset managers, 22investment funds, or investments for the local government's 23securities portfolios. 24    Section 10. The Illinois Pension Code is amended by 25changing Section 1-110.16 as follows:   HB4833- 3 -LRB104 19093 RPS 32538 b1    (40 ILCS 5/1-110.16)2    Sec. 1-110.16. Transactions prohibited by retirement 3systems; certain companies that boycott Israel, for-profit 4companies that contract to shelter migrant children, 5Iran-restricted companies, Sudan-restricted companies, 6expatriated entities, companies that are domiciled or have 7their principal place of business in Russia or Belarus, and 8companies that are subject to Russian Harmful Foreign 9Activities Sanctions.10    (a) As used in this Section:11        "Boycott Israel" means engaging in actions that are 12    politically motivated and are intended to penalize, 13    inflict economic harm on, or otherwise limit commercial 14    relations with the State of Israel or companies based in 15    the State of Israel or in territories controlled by the 16    State of Israel.17        "Company" means any sole proprietorship, organization, 18    association, corporation, partnership, joint venture, 19    limited partnership, limited liability partnership, 20    limited liability company, or other entity or business 21    association, including all wholly owned subsidiaries, 22    majority-owned subsidiaries, parent companies, or 23    affiliates of those entities or business associations, 24    that exist for the purpose of making profit.25        "Company that is subject to Russian Harmful Foreign   HB4833- 4 -LRB104 19093 RPS 32538 b1    Activities Sanctions" means a company that is subject to 2    sanctions under the Russian Harmful Foreign Activities 3    Sanctions Regulations (31 CFR Part 587), any Presidential 4    Executive Order imposing sanctions against Russia, or any 5    federal directive issued pursuant to any such Executive 6    Order. 7        "Contract to shelter incarcerated or detained persons" 8    means contracting with a local government, a state 9    government, or the federal government to shelter 10    individuals for the provision of services relating to 11    community correctional supervision, the operation of a 12    correctional facility, or the incarceration of persons for 13    violations of local, state, or federal criminal law or to 14    shelter individuals detained for federal civil immigration 15    violations under the federal Immigration and Nationality 16    Act. "Contract to shelter incarcerated or detained 17    persons" does not include a private contractor or private 18    vendor under item (1) or (2) of Section 3 of the Private 19    Correctional Facility Moratorium Act. 20        "Contract to shelter migrant children" means entering 21    into a contract with the federal government to shelter 22    migrant children under the federal Unaccompanied Alien 23    Children Program or a substantially similar federal 24    program. 25        "Direct holdings" in a company means all publicly 26    traded securities of that company that are held directly   HB4833- 5 -LRB104 19093 RPS 32538 b1    by the retirement system in an actively managed account or 2    fund in which the retirement system owns all shares or 3    interests.4        "Expatriated entity" has the meaning ascribed to it in 5    Section 1-15.120 of the Illinois Procurement Code. 6        "Illinois Investment Policy Board" means the board 7    established under subsection (b) of this Section. 8        "Indirect holdings" in a company means all securities 9    of that company that are held in an account or fund, such 10    as a mutual fund, managed by one or more persons not 11    employed by the retirement system, in which the retirement 12    system owns shares or interests together with other 13    investors not subject to the provisions of this Section or 14    that are held in an index fund.15        "Iran-restricted company" means a company that meets 16    the qualifications under Section 1-110.15 of this Code.17        "Private market fund" means any private equity fund, 18    private equity funds of funds, venture capital fund, hedge 19    fund, hedge fund of funds, real estate fund, or other 20    investment vehicle that is not publicly traded.21        "Restricted companies" means companies that boycott 22    Israel, for-profit companies that contract to shelter 23    migrant children, for-profit companies that contract to 24    shelter incarcerated or detained persons, Iran-restricted 25    companies, Sudan-restricted companies, expatriated 26    entities, companies that are domiciled or have their   HB4833- 6 -LRB104 19093 RPS 32538 b1    principal place of business in Russia or Belarus, and 2    companies that are subject to Russian Harmful Foreign 3    Activities Sanctions.4        "Retirement system" means a retirement system 5    established under Article 2, 14, 15, 16, or 18 of this Code 6    or the Illinois State Board of Investment.7        "Sudan-restricted company" means a company that meets 8    the qualifications under Section 1-110.6 of this Code.9    (b) There shall be established an Illinois Investment 10Policy Board. The Illinois Investment Policy Board shall 11consist of 7 members. Each board of a pension fund or 12investment board created under Article 15, 16, or 22A of this 13Code shall appoint one member, and the Governor shall appoint 144 members. The Governor shall designate one member of the 15Board as the Chairperson. 16    (b-5) The term of office of each member appointed by the 17Governor, who is serving on the Board on June 30, 2022, is 18abolished on that date. The terms of office of members 19appointed by the Governor after June 30, 2022 shall be as 20follows: 2 initial members shall be appointed for terms of 2 21years, and 2 initial members shall be appointed for terms of 4 22years. Thereafter, the members appointed by the Governor shall 23hold office for 4 years, except that any member chosen to fill 24a vacancy occurring otherwise than by expiration of a term 25shall be appointed only for the unexpired term of the member 26whom he or she shall succeed. Board members may be   HB4833- 7 -LRB104 19093 RPS 32538 b1reappointed. The Governor may remove a Governor's appointee to 2the Board for incompetence, neglect of duty, malfeasance, or 3inability to serve. 4    (c) Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, 5beginning January 1, 2016, Sections 1-110.15 and 1-110.6 of 6this Code shall be administered in accordance with this 7Section.8    (d) By April 1, 2016, the Illinois Investment Policy Board 9shall make its best efforts to identify all Iran-restricted 10companies, Sudan-restricted companies, and companies that 11boycott Israel and assemble those identified companies into a 12list of restricted companies, to be distributed to each 13retirement system.14    These efforts shall include the following, as appropriate 15in the Illinois Investment Policy Board's judgment:16        (1) reviewing and relying on publicly available 17    information regarding Iran-restricted companies, 18    Sudan-restricted companies, and companies that boycott 19    Israel, including information provided by nonprofit 20    organizations, research firms, and government entities;21        (2) contacting asset managers contracted by the 22    retirement systems that invest in Iran-restricted 23    companies, Sudan-restricted companies, and companies that 24    boycott Israel;25        (3) contacting other institutional investors that have 26    divested from or engaged with Iran-restricted companies,   HB4833- 8 -LRB104 19093 RPS 32538 b1    Sudan-restricted companies, and companies that boycott 2    Israel; and3        (4) retaining an independent research firm to identify 4    Iran-restricted companies, Sudan-restricted companies, 5    and companies that boycott Israel.6    The Illinois Investment Policy Board shall review the list 7of restricted companies on a quarterly basis based on evolving 8information from, among other sources, those listed in this 9subsection (d) and distribute any updates to the list of 10restricted companies to the retirement systems and the State 11Treasurer.12    By April 1, 2018, the Illinois Investment Policy Board 13shall make its best efforts to identify all expatriated 14entities and include those companies in the list of restricted 15companies distributed to each retirement system and the State 16Treasurer. These efforts shall include the following, as 17appropriate in the Illinois Investment Policy Board's 18judgment:19        (1) reviewing and relying on publicly available 20    information regarding expatriated entities, including 21    information provided by nonprofit organizations, research 22    firms, and government entities;23        (2) contacting asset managers contracted by the 24    retirement systems that invest in expatriated entities;25        (3) contacting other institutional investors that have 26    divested from or engaged with expatriated entities; and  HB4833- 9 -LRB104 19093 RPS 32538 b1        (4) retaining an independent research firm to identify 2    expatriated entities. 3    By July 1, 2022, the Illinois Investment Policy Board 4shall make its best efforts to identify all for-profit 5companies that contract to shelter migrant children and 6include those companies in the list of restricted companies 7distributed to each retirement system. These efforts shall 8include the following, as appropriate in the Illinois 9Investment Policy Board's judgment: 10        (1) reviewing and relying on publicly available 11    information regarding for-profit companies that contract 12    to shelter migrant children, including information 13    provided by nonprofit organizations, research firms, and 14    government entities;15        (2) contacting asset managers contracted by the 16    retirement systems that invest in for-profit companies 17    that contract to shelter migrant children; 18        (3) contacting other institutional investors that have 19    divested from or engaged with for-profit companies that 20    contract to shelter migrant children; and21        (4) retaining an independent research firm to identify 22    for-profit companies that contract to shelter migrant 23    children. 24    No later than 6 months after the effective date of this 25amendatory Act of the 102nd General Assembly, the Illinois 26Investment Policy Board shall make its best efforts to   HB4833- 10 -LRB104 19093 RPS 32538 b1identify all companies that are domiciled or have their 2principal place of business in Russia or Belarus and companies 3that are subject to Russian Harmful Foreign Activities 4Sanctions and include those companies in the list of 5restricted companies distributed to each retirement system. 6These efforts shall include the following, as appropriate in 7the Illinois Investment Policy Board's judgment: 8        (1) reviewing and relying on publicly available 9    information regarding companies that are domiciled or have 10    their principal place of business in Russia or Belarus and 11    companies that are subject to Russian Harmful Foreign 12    Activities Sanctions, including information provided by 13    nonprofit organizations, research firms, and government 14    entities; 15        (2) contacting asset managers contracted by the 16    retirement systems that invest in companies that are 17    domiciled or have their principal place of business in 18    Russia or Belarus and companies that are subject to 19    Russian Harmful Foreign Activities Sanctions; 20        (3) contacting other institutional investors that have 21    divested from or engaged with companies that are domiciled 22    or have their principal place of business in Russia or 23    Belarus and companies that are subject to Russian Harmful 24    Foreign Activities Sanctions; and 25        (4) retaining an independent research firm to identify 26    companies that are domiciled or have their principal place   HB4833- 11 -LRB104 19093 RPS 32538 b1    of business in Russia or Belarus and companies that are 2    subject to Russian Harmful Foreign Activities Sanctions. 3    No later than 6 months after the effective date of this 4amendatory Act of the 104th General Assembly, the Illinois 5Investment Policy Board shall make its best efforts to 6identify all for-profit companies that contract to shelter 7incarcerated or detained persons and include those companies 8in the list of restricted companies distributed to each 9retirement system. These efforts shall include the following, 10as appropriate in the Illinois Investment Policy Board's 11judgment:12        (1) reviewing and relying on publicly available 13    information regarding for-profit companies that contract 14    to shelter incarcerated or detained persons, including 15    information provided by nonprofit organizations, research 16    firms, and government entities;17        (2) contacting asset managers contracted by the 18    retirement systems that invest in for-profit companies 19    that contract to shelter incarcerated or detained persons;20        (3) contacting other institutional investors that have 21    divested from or engaged with for-profit companies that 22    contract to shelter incarcerated or detained persons; and23        (4) retaining an independent research firm to identify 24    for-profit companies that contract to shelter incarcerated 25    or detained persons. 26    (e) The Illinois Investment Policy Board shall adhere to   HB4833- 12 -LRB104 19093 RPS 32538 b1the following procedures for companies on the list of 2restricted companies:3        (1) For each company newly identified in subsection 4    (d), the Illinois Investment Policy Board, unless it 5    determines by an affirmative vote that it is unfeasible, 6    shall send a written notice informing the company of its 7    status and that it may become subject to divestment or 8    shareholder activism by the retirement systems.9        (2) If, following the Illinois Investment Policy 10    Board's engagement pursuant to this subsection (e) with a 11    restricted company, that company ceases activity that 12    designates the company to be an Iran-restricted company, a 13    Sudan-restricted company, a company that boycotts Israel, 14    an expatriated entity, or a for-profit company that 15    contracts to shelter migrant children, or a for-profit 16    company that contracts to shelter incarcerated or detained 17    persons, the company shall be removed from the list of 18    restricted companies and the provisions of this Section 19    shall cease to apply to it unless it resumes such 20    activities.21        (3) For a company that is domiciled or has its 22    principal place of business in Russia or Belarus, if, 23    following the Illinois Investment Policy Board's 24    engagement pursuant to this subsection (e), that company 25    is no longer domiciled or has its principal place of 26    business in Russia or Belarus, the company shall be   HB4833- 13 -LRB104 19093 RPS 32538 b1    removed from the list of restricted companies and the 2    provisions of this Section shall cease to apply to it 3    unless it becomes domiciled or has its principal place of 4    business in Russia or Belarus. 5        (4) For a company that is subject to Russian Harmful 6    Foreign Activities Sanctions, if, following the Illinois 7    Investment Policy Board's engagement pursuant to this 8    subsection (e), that company is no longer subject to 9    Russian Harmful Foreign Activities Sanctions, the company 10    shall be removed from the list of restricted companies and 11    the provisions of this Section shall cease to apply to it 12    unless it becomes subject to Russian Harmful Foreign 13    Activities Sanctions. 14    (f) Except as provided in subsection (f-1) of this Section 15the retirement system shall adhere to the following procedures 16for companies on the list of restricted companies:17        (1) The retirement system shall identify those 18    companies on the list of restricted companies in which the 19    retirement system owns direct holdings and indirect 20    holdings.21        (2) The retirement system shall instruct its 22    investment advisors to sell, redeem, divest, or withdraw 23    all direct holdings of restricted companies from the 24    retirement system's assets under management in an orderly 25    and fiduciarily responsible manner within 12 months after 26    the company's most recent appearance on the list of   HB4833- 14 -LRB104 19093 RPS 32538 b1    restricted companies.2        (3) The retirement system may not acquire securities 3    of restricted companies.4        (4) The provisions of this subsection (f) do not apply 5    to the retirement system's indirect holdings or private 6    market funds. The Illinois Investment Policy Board shall 7    submit letters to the managers of those investment funds 8    containing restricted companies requesting that they 9    consider removing the companies from the fund or create a 10    similar actively managed fund having indirect holdings 11    devoid of the companies. If the manager creates a similar 12    fund, the retirement system shall replace all applicable 13    investments with investments in the similar fund in an 14    expedited timeframe consistent with prudent investing 15    standards.16    (f-1) The retirement system shall adhere to the following 17procedures for restricted companies that are expatriated 18entities or for-profit companies that contract to shelter 19migrant children:20        (1) To the extent that the retirement system believes 21    that shareholder activism would be more impactful than 22    divestment, the retirement system shall have the authority 23    to engage with a restricted company prior to divesting.24        (2) Subject to any applicable State or Federal laws, 25    methods of shareholder activism utilized by the retirement 26    system may include, but are not limited to, bringing   HB4833- 15 -LRB104 19093 RPS 32538 b1    shareholder resolutions and proxy voting on shareholder 2    resolutions.3        (3) The retirement system shall report on its 4    shareholder activism and the outcome of such efforts to 5    the Illinois Investment Policy Board by April 1 of each 6    year.7        (4) If the engagement efforts of the retirement system 8    are unsuccessful, then it shall adhere to the procedures 9    under subsection (f) of this Section. 10    (f-5) Beginning on the effective date of this amendatory 11Act of the 102nd General Assembly, no retirement system shall 12invest moneys in Russian or Belarusian sovereign debt, Russian 13or Belarusian government-backed securities, any investment 14instrument issued by an entity that is domiciled or has its 15principal place of business in Russia or Belarus, or any 16investment instrument issued by a company that is subject to 17Russian Harmful Foreign Activities Sanctions, and no 18retirement system shall invest or deposit State moneys in any 19bank that is domiciled or has its principal place of business 20in Russia or Belarus. As soon as practicable after the 21effective date of this amendatory Act of the 102nd General 22Assembly, each retirement system shall instruct its investment 23advisors to sell, redeem, divest, or withdraw all direct 24holdings of Russian or Belarusian sovereign debt and direct 25holdings of Russian or Belarusian government-backed securities 26from the retirement system's assets under management in an   HB4833- 16 -LRB104 19093 RPS 32538 b1orderly and fiduciarily responsible manner.2    Notwithstanding any provision of this Section to the 3contrary, a retirement system may cease divestment pursuant to 4this subsection (f-5) if clear and convincing evidence shows 5that the value of investments in such Russian or Belarusian 6sovereign debt and Russian or Belarusian government-backed 7securities becomes equal to or less than 0.05% of the market 8value of all assets under management by the retirement system. 9For any cessation of divestment authorized by this subsection 10(f-5), the retirement system shall provide a written notice to 11the Illinois Investment Policy Board in advance of the 12cessation of divestment, setting forth the reasons and 13justification, supported by clear and convincing evidence, for 14its decision to cease divestment under this subsection (f-5). 15    The provisions of this subsection (f-5) do not apply to 16the retirement system's indirect holdings or private market 17funds. 18    (g) Upon request, and by April 1 of each year, each 19retirement system shall provide the Illinois Investment Policy 20Board with information regarding investments sold, redeemed, 21divested, or withdrawn in compliance with this Section.22    (h) Notwithstanding any provision of this Section to the 23contrary, a retirement system may cease divesting from 24companies pursuant to subsection (f) if clear and convincing 25evidence shows that the value of investments in such companies 26becomes equal to or less than 0.5% of the market value of all   HB4833- 17 -LRB104 19093 RPS 32538 b1assets under management by the retirement system; except that 2this subsection (h) does not apply to investments in 3for-profit companies that contract to shelter incarcerated or 4detained persons. For any cessation of divestment authorized 5by this subsection (h), the retirement system shall provide a 6written notice to the Illinois Investment Policy Board in 7advance of the cessation of divestment, setting forth the 8reasons and justification, supported by clear and convincing 9evidence, for its decision to cease divestment under 10subsection (f). 11    (i) The cost associated with the activities of the 12Illinois Investment Policy Board shall be borne by the boards 13of each pension fund or investment board created under Article 1415, 16, or 22A of this Code. 15    (j) With respect to actions taken in compliance with this 16Section, including all good-faith determinations regarding 17companies as required by this Section, the retirement system 18and Illinois Investment Policy Board are exempt from any 19conflicting statutory or common law obligations, including any 20fiduciary duties under this Article and any obligations with 21respect to choice of asset managers, investment funds, or 22investments for the retirement system's securities portfolios.23    (k) It is not the intent of the General Assembly in 24enacting this amendatory Act of the 99th General Assembly to 25cause divestiture from any company based in the United States 26of America. The Illinois Investment Policy Board shall   HB4833- 18 -LRB104 19093 RPS 32538 b1consider this intent when developing or reviewing the list of 2restricted companies. 3    (l) If any provision of this amendatory Act of the 99th 4General Assembly or its application to any person or 5circumstance is held invalid, the invalidity of that provision 6or application does not affect other provisions or 7applications of this amendatory Act of the 99th General 8Assembly that can be given effect without the invalid 9provision or application.10    If any provision of Public Act 100-551 or its application 11to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the invalidity 12of that provision or application does not affect other 13provisions or applications of Public Act 100-551 that can be 14given effect without the invalid provision or application. 15    If any provision of Public Act 102-118 or its application 16to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the invalidity 17of that provision or application does not affect other 18provisions or applications of Public Act 102-118 that can be 19given effect without the invalid provision or application. 20    If any provision of this amendatory Act of the 102nd 21General Assembly or its application to any person or 22circumstance is held invalid, the invalidity of that provision 23or application does not affect other provisions or 24applications of this amendatory Act of the 102nd General 25Assembly that can be given effect without the invalid 26provision or application.   HB4833- 19 -LRB104 19093 RPS 32538 b1    If any provision of this amendatory Act of the 104th 2General Assembly or its application to any person or 3circumstance is held invalid, the invalidity of that provision 4or application does not affect other provisions or 5applications of this amendatory Act of the 104th General 6Assembly that can be given effect without the invalid 7provision or application. 8(Source: P.A. 102-118, eff. 7-23-21; 102-699, eff. 4-19-22; 9102-1108, eff. 12-21-22.) 10    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect upon 11becoming law.